Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.490

Discipline task force—Development of standard definitions—Development of data collection standards—Membership—Statewide student data system revision.

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall convene a discipline task force to develop standard definitions for causes of student disciplinary actions taken at the discretion of the school district. The task force must also develop data collection standards for disciplinary actions that are discretionary and for disciplinary actions that result in the exclusion of a student from school. The data collection standards must include data about education services provided while a student is subject to a disciplinary action, the status of petitions for readmission to the school district when a student has been excluded from school, credit retrieval during a period of exclusion, and school dropout as a result of disciplinary action.

(2) The discipline task force shall include representatives from the K-12 data governance group, the educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee, the state ethnic commissions, the governor's office of Indian affairs, the office of the education ombuds, school districts, tribal representatives, and other education and advocacy organizations.

(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the K-12 data governance group shall revise the statewide student data system to incorporate the student discipline data collection standards recommended by the discipline task force, and begin collecting data based on the revised standards in the 2015-16 school year.

[ 2016 c 72 s 101; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 301.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2016 c 72: See note following RCW 28A.600.015.

Application—Enforcement of laws protecting health and safety—2013 2nd sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28A.600.022.